Hawaii statutes.
§182-14 Rules. Subject to chapter 91,
the board may adopt and amend rules as it deems necessary to carry out this
chapter and to perform its duties thereunder, all commensurate with and for the
purpose of protecting the public interest. All rules shall have the force and
effect of law. [L 1963, c 11, pt of §1; Supp, §99A-14; HRS §182-14; am L 2016,
c 220, §9]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next